Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.157

Deferred prosecution—Mental health disorder. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

A deferred prosecution for mental health disorder where the wrongful conduct did not involve, and was not caused by, alcohol, drugs, or a substance use disorder, shall include treatment recommended by a state-approved mental health provider.

[ 2024 c 306 s 24.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 306: See note following RCW 9.94A.661.